Washington statutes.
RCW 19.94.544

Antifreeze products—Aversive agents—Application.

The requirements of this section and RCW 19.94.540 and 19.94.542 shall not apply to the sale of a motor vehicle that contains engine coolant or antifreeze.

[ 2018 c 198 s 1; 2008 c 68 s 3.]